Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 7. Prisoner Programs and Treatment.

§ 53.1-128.
Workforces and authorized work places.

The local governing body of any county, city or town may establish workforces in the county, city or town under such conditions as it may prescribe. Such workforces are authorized to work on (i) public property or works owned, leased or operated by the Commonwealth or the county, city or town; (ii) a privately operated national park on federal land; (iii) any property owned by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or (c)(4) and that is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes whether the same is located within such county, city or town, or elsewhere; or (iv) private property (a) owned or occupied by an elderly or indigent person or persons where such property has been identified by a citizens housing advisory committee as needing rehabilitation or repair and the property owner has consented to such work or (b) classified as or used as a cemetery where such property has been abandoned and where on such property exist nuisances that have been identified by a municipal corporation for abatement or removal pursuant to §

15.2-1115

or a similar local ordinance. Every person 18 years of age or older who is convicted and confined for any violation of a local ordinance and who is confined as a punishment or for failure to pay a required fine, shall be liable to work in such workforce. Every person 18 years of age or older who is confined pending disposition of an offense under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20 or a criminal offense not listed in §

19.2-297.1

may work in such workforce on a voluntary basis with the approval of and under the supervision of the sheriff or his designee.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-163; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 580; 1997, cc. 123, 546; 2010, c. 168; 2011, c. 767; 2019, c. 199.

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendment by c. 123 inserted “or on a privately operated national park on federal land” in the second sentence.

The 1997 amendment by c. 546 inserted “or any property owned by a nonprofit organization which is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (c) (3) or (c) (4) and which is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes” in the second sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 168 substituted “workforces” for “work forces,” “that” for “which” and “workforce” for “work force” throughout the section; in the second sentence, inserted “the Commonwealth or” following “leased or operated by,” deleted “or” following “federal land” and added the language beginning “or on private property owned or occupied” at the end; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 767, in the first sentence inserted clause (i) to (iv) and clause (iv)(a) designations, added clause (iv)(b), and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 199 deleted “a nonviolent criminal offense or” following “disposition of,” inserted “or a criminal offense not listed in §

19.2-297.1

” and added “or his designee” at the end.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 98, 99.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Inmate crews. —

Inmate crews may work on property outside the jurisdiction of the sheriff when authorized by court order or, if the workforce is established by the local governing body, only when the property is owned by a tax-exempt nonprofit organization that is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

Assuming all other statutory provisions are met, inmate crews may cultivate a garden on private property leased to a nonprofit organization so long as the nonprofit organization qualifies as exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3). See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

Inmate crews, pursuant to court order, may maintain trails on private property leased to a nonprofit organization provided the nonprofit organization qualifies as exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3). See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

§ 53.1-129.
Order permitting prisoners to work on state, county, city, town, certain private property or nonprofit organization property; bond of person in charge of prisoners.

The circuit court of any county or city may, by order entered of record, allow persons confined in the jail of such county or city who are awaiting disposition of, or serving sentences imposed for, misdemeanors or felonies to work on (i) state, county, city or town property, (ii) any property owned by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and that is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes on a voluntary basis with the consent of the county, city, town or state agency or the local public service authority or upon the request of the nonprofit organization involved, (iii) private property that is part of a community improvement project sponsored by a locality or that has structures that are found to be public nuisances pursuant to §§

15.2-900

and

15.2-906

provided that the court has reviewed and approved the project for the purposes herein and permits the prisoners to work on such project, (iv) any private property utilized by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), or (v) private property in any locality that meets the criteria under an ordinance adopted by such locality under §

15.2-908

. The district court of any county or city may allow persons confined in the jail of such county or city who are awaiting disposition of, or serving sentences imposed for, misdemeanors to work on (a) state, county, city or town property, (b) any property owned by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) and that is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes on a voluntary basis with consent of the county, city, town or state agency or the local public service authority or upon the request of the nonprofit organization involved, (c) private property that is part of a community improvement project sponsored by a locality or that has structures that are found to be public nuisances pursuant to §§

15.2-900

and

15.2-906

provided that the court has reviewed and approved the project for the purposes herein and permits the prisoners to work on such project, (d) any private property utilized by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), or (e) private property in any locality that meets the criteria under an ordinance adopted by such locality under §

15.2-908

. Prisoners performing work as provided in this paragraph may receive credit on their respective sentences for the work done, whether such sentences are imposed prior or subsequent to the work done, as the court orders.

The court may, by order entered of record, require a person convicted of a felony to work on state, county, city or town property, with the consent of the county, city, town or state agency or the local public service authority involved, for such credit on his sentence as the court orders.

In the event that a person other than the sheriff or jail superintendent is designated by the court to have charge of such prisoners while so working, the court shall require a bond of the person, in an amount to be fixed by the court, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his duties. Neither the sheriff nor the jail superintendent shall be held responsible for any acts of omission or commission on the part of such person.

Any person committed to jail upon a felony offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, who receives credit on his sentence as provided in this section shall not be entitled to good conduct credit, sentence credit, earned sentence credit, other credit, or a combination of any credits in excess of that permissible under Article 4 (§

53.1-202.2

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of this title. So much of an order of any court contrary to the provisions of Article 4 shall be deemed null and void.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-165; 1976, c. 618; 1978, c. 609; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 43; 1991, c. 580; 1994, c. 269; 1997, cc. 134, 546; 1998, c. 311; 1999, cc. 277, 951, 1007; 2001, cc. 185, 196; 2003, cc. 818, 820; 2005, c. 409; 2008, c. 623; 2010, c. 132.

The 1997 amendments.

The 1997 amendment by c. 134 inserted “or the local public service authority” following “state agency” in three places.

The 1997 amendment by c. 546, in the first paragraph, in the first and second sentences, inserted “or any property owned by a nonprofit organization which is exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (c) (3) or (c) (4) and which is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes” and inserted “or upon the request of the nonprofit organization.”

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, in the first and second sentences, and in the second paragraph, substituted “county, city or town property” for “county or, city property,” and inserted “town” following “consent of the county, city.”

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 277, in the first paragraph, inserted “(i)” following “to work on,” substituted “(ii)” for “or,” inserted “or (iii) private property which is part of a community improvement project sponsored by a locality,” inserted “(i)” following “misdemeanors to work on,” substituted “(ii)” for “or,” and inserted “or (iii) private property which is part of a community improvement project sponsored by a locality.”

The 1999 amendments by cc. 951 and 1007 are identical, and in the first paragraph, deleted “judge of the” preceding “circuit court” in the first sentence, deleted “judge of the” preceding “district court” in the second sentence, and substituted “the court orders” for “the court may in the order prescribe” in the third sentence; in the second paragraph, substituted “court” for “judge,” and substituted “the court orders” for “judge may prescribe in his order”; and added the fourth paragraph.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by c. 185 and 196 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “that” for “which” throughout; inserted “or that has structures that are found to be public nuisances pursuant to §§

15.2-900

and

15.2-906

provided that the court has reviewed and approved the project for the purposes herein and permits the prisoner to work on such project” in clause (iii) of the first sentence; and in the second sentence, substituted “(a)” for “(i),” (b)” for “(ii),” “(c)” for “(iii),” and inserted “or that has structures that are found to be public nuisances pursuant to §§

15.2-900

and

15.2-906

provided that the court has reviewed and approved the project for the purposes herein and permits the prisoner to work on such project.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 818 and 820 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “by specific order entered of record for an identified individual prisoner, allow a person confined in the jail of such county or city who is awaiting” for “may, by order entered of record, allow persons confined in the jail of such county or city who are awaiting” near the beginning of the first sentence, substituted “may, by specific order for an identified individual prisoner, allow a person confined in the jail of such county or city who is awaiting” for “may allow persons confined in the jail of such county or city who are awaiting” near the beginning of the second sentence, and added the last sentence; and substituted “may, by specific order entered of record for an identified individual prisoner, require” for “may, by order entered of record, require” near the beginning of the second paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 409, in the first paragraph, deleted “specific” preceding “order,” “for an identified individual prisoner” following “entered of record,” “by specific order for an identified individual prisoner” following “county or city may,” and the last sentence which read: “For all offenses committed on or after July 1, 2003, any order that does not specifically identify individual prisoners shall be void.”, substituted “persons” for “person” two times, “are” for “is,” and “prisoners” for “prisoner” two times; in the second paragraph, deleted “specific” preceding “order” and “for an identified individual prisoner” preceding “require a person.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 623, in first paragraph, added clauses (iv) and (d), substituted “26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)” for “26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (3) or (c)(4)” twice, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 132, in the first paragraph, added clause (v) at the end of the first sentence, added clause (e) at the end of the second sentence, and made related changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Prisoners working outside city. —

Prisoner-workers from a city jail may work on state, county and city property located outside the city; however, the sheriff has no authority to supervise the prisoner-workers while they are working outside the sheriff’s jurisdiction. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Gary W. Waters, Sheriff for the City of Portsmouth, 03-056 (8/5/03).

Work crews outside jurisdiction of sheriff. —

Inmate crews may work on property outside the jurisdiction of the sheriff when authorized by court order or, if the workforce is established by the local governing body, only when the property is owned by a tax-exempt nonprofit organization that is organized and operated exclusively for charitable or social welfare purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

Assuming all other statutory provisions are met, inmate crews may cultivate a garden on private property leased to a nonprofit organization so long as the nonprofit organization qualifies as exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3). See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

Inmate crews, pursuant to court order, may maintain trails on private property leased to a nonprofit organization provided the nonprofit organization qualifies as exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3). See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

§ 53.1-130.
Sheriffs, jail superintendents, etc., not to be interested in property where work performed; penalty.

No sheriff, jail superintendent, deputy or other jail officer shall have any prisoner work on property owned by him or by his relative, or on projects in which he is interested, nor shall any such prisoner be used for the personal gain or convenience of any sheriff or of any other individual. Any person found guilty of a violation of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-166; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 53.1-131.
Provision for release of prisoner from confinement for employment, educational or other rehabilitative programs; escape; penalty; disposition of earnings.

Any court having jurisdiction for the trial of a person charged with a criminal offense or charged with an offense under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20 may, if the defendant is convicted and (i) sentenced to confinement in jail or (ii) being held in jail pending completion of a presentence report pursuant to §

19.2-299

, and if it appears to the court that such offender is a suitable candidate for work release, assign the offender to a work release program under the supervision of a probation officer, the sheriff or the administrator of a local or regional jail or a program designated by the court. The court further may authorize the offender to participate in educational or other rehabilitative programs designed to supplement his work release employment. The court shall be notified in writing by the director or administrator of the program to which the offender is assigned of the offender’s place of employment and the location of any educational or rehabilitative program in which the offender participates.Any person who has been sentenced to confinement in jail or who has been convicted of a felony but is confined in jail pursuant to §

53.1-20

, in the discretion of the sheriff may be assigned by the sheriff to a work release program under the supervision of the sheriff or the administrator of a local or regional jail. The sheriff may further authorize the offender to participate in educational or other rehabilitative programs as defined in this section designed to supplement his work release employment. The court that sentenced the offender shall be notified in writing by the sheriff or the administrator of a local or regional jail of any such assignment and of the offender’s place of employment or other rehabilitative program. The court, in its discretion, may thereafter revoke the authority for such an offender to participate in a work release program.The sheriff and the Director may enter into agreements whereby persons who are committed to the Department, whether such persons are housed in a state or local correctional facility, and who have met all standards for such release, may participate in a local work release program or in educational or other rehabilitative programs as defined in this section. The administrator of a regional jail and the Director may also enter into such agreements where such agreements are approved in advance by a majority of the sheriffs on the regional jail board. All persons accepted in accordance with this section shall be governed by all regulations applying to local work release, notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of the Code. Local jails shall qualify for compensation for cost of incarceration of such persons pursuant to §

53.1-20.1

, less any payment for room and board collected from the inmate.If an offender who has been assigned to such a program by the court is in violation of the rules of the jail pursuant to §

53.1-117

, the sheriff or jail administrator may remove the offender from the work release program, either temporarily or for the duration of the offender’s confinement. Upon removing an offender from the work release program, the sheriff or jail administrator shall notify in writing the court that sentenced the offender and indicate the specific violations that led to the decision.Any offender assigned to such a program by the court or sheriff who, without proper authority or just cause, leaves the area to which he has been assigned to work or attend educational or other rehabilitative programs, or leaves the vehicle or route of travel involved in his going to or returning from such place, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In the event such offender leaves the Commonwealth, the offender may be found guilty of an escape as provided in §

18.2-477

. An offender who is found guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor in accordance with this section shall be ineligible for further participation in a work release program during his current term of confinement.The Board shall prescribe regulations to govern the work release, educational and other rehabilitative programs authorized by this section.Any wages earned pursuant to this section by an offender may, upon order of the court, be paid to the director or administrator of the program after standard payroll deductions required by law. Distribution of such wages shall be made for the following purposes:

To pay an amount to defray the cost of his keep;

To pay travel and other such expenses made necessary by his work release employment or participation in an educational or rehabilitative program;

To provide support and maintenance for his dependents or to make payments to the local department of social services or the Commissioner of Social Services, as appropriate, on behalf of dependents who are receiving public assistance or social services as defined in §

63.2-100

; or

To pay any fines, restitution or costs as ordered by the court.Any balance at the end of his sentence shall be paid to the offender upon his release.

For the purposes of this section:“Educational program” means a program of learning recognized by the State Council of Higher Education, the State Board of Education, the Director, or the State Board of Local and Regional Jails.“Rehabilitative program” includes an alcohol and drug treatment program, mental health program, family counseling, community service or other community program approved by the court having jurisdiction over the offender.“Sheriff” means the sheriff of the jurisdiction where the person charged with the criminal offense was convicted and sentenced, provided that the sheriff may designate a deputy sheriff or regional jail administrator to assign offenders to work release programs under this section.“Work release” means full-time employment or participation in suitable career and technical education programs.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 19-273.1, 53-166.1; 1956, c. 688; Code 1950, § 19.1-300; 1960, c. 366; 1970, c. 121; 1972, c. 145; 1973, c. 38; 1976, c. 295; 1979, c. 706; 1980, c. 566; 1982, c. 636; 1984, c. 516; 1985, c. 301; 1988, c. 397; 1989, c. 586; 1990, cc. 107, 676, 768; 2000, c. 423; 2002, cc. 747, 800; 2006, c. 792; 2020, c. 759.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

The phrase “career and technical education” has been substituted for “vocational training” in the definition of “Work release” at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, pursuant to Acts 2001, c. 483. Acts 2001, c. 483, cl. 4, provides that whenever any references are used in the Code of Virginia to vocational education or to vocational technical education or, when used to denote an education program, to vocational rehabilitation or any other state or local program name that clearly relates to career and technical education within its context, such terms shall be deemed to be subsumed by, synonymous with and included in the term “career and technical education.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 68 L, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

53.1-131

through

53.1-131.3

, Code of Virginia, local and regional jails may charge inmates participating in inmate work programs a reasonable daily amount, not to exceed the actual daily cost, to operate the program.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 423 substituted “Class 1” for “Class 2” in the fourth paragraph in two places.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, in subdivision A 3, deleted “welfare or” following “departments of,” inserted “or social services” following “public assistance,” and substituted “§

63.2-100

” for “§ 63.1-87.”

The 2002 amendment by c. 800, in subsection A, deleted “office of the” preceding “sheriff” in the first sentence in the first paragraph, in the second paragraph, deleted ‘’or the administrator of a local or regional jail” following the first occurrence of “sheriff,” deleted “or the administrator of a local or regional jail” following the second occurrence of “sheriff,” deleted “office of the” preceding the third occurrence of “sheriff,”and deleted “or the administrator of a local or regional jail” following the fourth occurrence of “sheriff,” in the third paragraph, deleted “or other administrative head of a local correctional facility” following “sheriff” in the first sentence, and inserted the second sentence, and in the first sentence in the fourth paragraph, deleted “or the administrator of a local or regional jail” following “sheriff” and substituted “is” for “shall be” preceding “guilty”; deleted “welfare or” following “department of” in subdivision A 3; and inserted the definition of “sheriff” in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 792 inserted the fourth paragraph in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 759 substituted “Education, the Director, or the State Board of Local and Regional Jails” for “Education or the State Board of Corrections” in subsection B in the definition for “Educational program.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 92, 98.

§ 53.1-131.1.
Provision for sentencing of person to nonconsecutive days in jail; payment to defray costs; penalty.

Any court having jurisdiction for the trial of a person charged with a misdemeanor, traffic offense, any offense under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20, or a felony that is not an act of violence as defined in §

19.2-297.1

may, for good cause, if the defendant is convicted and sentenced to confinement in jail and the active portion of the sentence remaining to be served is 45 days or less, impose the remaining time to be served on weekends or nonconsecutive days to permit the convicted defendant to retain gainful employment; however, the court shall not impose weekends or nonconsecutive days for a person convicted of a felony if the Commonwealth objects. A person sentenced pursuant to this section shall pay an amount to defray the cost of his keep, which amount shall be the actual cost of incarceration but shall not exceed that amount charged to the Compensation Board for purposes of reimbursement as provided in the general appropriation act. Such amount shall be collected by the sheriff, if he is responsible for operating a jail, or by the regional jail superintendent, and remitted by the sheriff to the treasurer of the appropriate county or city, or by the regional jail superintendent to the regional jail board or authority, solely for the purposes of defraying the costs of such weekend or nonconsecutive incarceration. The funds collected pursuant to this section shall not be used for purposes other than those provided for in this section. The assessment provided for herein shall be in addition to any other fees prescribed by law. If the defendant willfully fails to report at times specified by the court, the sentence imposed pursuant to this section shall be revoked and a straight jail sentence imposed.

If an offender who has been sentenced to nonconsecutive days by the court is in violation of the rules of the jail pursuant to §

53.1-117

, the sheriff or jail administrator may require the offender to serve out a portion or the entirety of the remainder of his sentence in consecutive days. Upon revoking the offender’s ability to serve his sentence on nonconsecutive days, the sheriff or jail administrator shall notify in writing the court that sentenced the offender and indicate the specific violations that led to the decision.

The time served by a person sentenced for violation of state law in a local jail, regional jail, or local jail farm pursuant to this section shall be included in the count of prisoner days reported by the Department for the purpose of apportioning state funds to local correctional facilities for operating costs in accordance with §

53.1-84

.

History.

1983, c. 172; 1984, c. 490; 1994, c. 901; 1999, c. 9; 2002, cc. 805, 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2006, c. 792; 2018, c. 535.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 68 L, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

53.1-131

through

53.1-131.3

, Code of Virginia, local and regional jails may charge inmates participating in inmate work programs a reasonable daily amount, not to exceed the actual daily cost, to operate the program.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 805, in the first paragraph, added “and remitted to the treasurer of the appropriate county or city for purposes of defraying costs herein” at the end of the third sentence and inserted the fourth sentence.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, in the first paragraph, rewrote the second sentence and deleted the third sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 rewrote the first paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 792 inserted the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 535 rewrote the first sentence, which formerly read “Any court having jurisdiction for the trial of a person charged with a misdemeanor or traffic offense or charged with any offense under Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) of Title 20 may, if the defendant is convicted and sentenced to confinement in jail, impose the time to be served on weekends or nonconsecutive days to permit the convicted defendant to retain gainful employment.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2909 Restricted Driver’s License Order — Failure to Pay Jail Fee.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Applicability. —

Trial court may not order a person convicted of a felony to serve any confinement in jail on weekends or nonconsecutive days. The plain language of §

53.1-131.1

, limits the court’s authority to convictions for misdemeanors, traffic offenses and violations of Chapter 5 (§

20-61

et seq.) Title 20. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Harvey L. Bryant, Commonwealth’s Attorney, City of Virginia Beach, 12-062, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (7/20/2012).